Vermont statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Subchapter 6. Property Settlement; Maintenance
§ 753.
Conveyance of realty after legal separation.

In all cases where a legal separation has been granted, a spouse may convey his or her real estate without the signature or consent of the other spouse, and the laws of descent applicable to absolute divorce shall apply.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 8.

§ 754.
Judgment effective to convey real estate.

A certified copy of the judgment, or relevant parts thereof, when recorded in the land records of the town in which real estate of the parties is located, shall be effective to convey or encumber the real estate in accordance with the terms of the judgment, as if the judgment were a deed.
A property transfer return shall be filed with the judgment, but the transfer shall be exempt from the taxes imposed by chapters 231 and 236 of Title 32 to the extent of the property interests conveyed to either of the parties.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 201

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

1981, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 9.

§ 755.
Judge out of office may sign judgment for maintenance.

After the expiration of his or her term of office, a judge of the Superior Court may sign a judgment for maintenance as of the date when made.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

1981, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 10.

§ 756.
Court may order money paid to trustees.

When part of the estate of either spouse, or money in lieu thereof, is awarded to the spouse having custody, as provided in this subchapter and sections 291, 293, and 294 of this title, instead of ordering the same to be delivered or paid into the hands of the custodial spouse, the court may order it delivered or paid to one or more trustees appointed by the court.
The trustees shall invest the same and apply the income thereof to the support and maintenance of the custodial spouse and minor children of the civil marriage or any of them, in such manner as the court directs, and shall pay over the principal to the custodial spouse and children in such proportions and at such times as shall be ordered by the court.
In the disposition of the income and of the principal, regard shall be had to the situation and circumstances of the custodial spouse and children, and the trustees shall give such bonds as the court requires for the faithful performance of their trust.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 11;

2009, No. 3

, § 12a, eff. Sept. 1, 2009.

§ 757.
Security for payment.

When maintenance or other annual allowance is granted to either spouse or children, the court may require sufficient security to be given for payment thereof, according to the terms of the judgment.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 12.

§ 758.
Revision of judgment relating to maintenance.

On motion of either party and due notice, and upon a showing of a real, substantial, and unanticipated change of circumstances, the court may from time to time annul, vary or modify a judgment relative to maintenance, whether or not such judgment relative to maintenance is based upon a stipulation or an agreement.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 181, eff. March 29, 1972;

1981, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

Division of real estate.

The division of real estate in a divorce proceeding is a final division of property and such a determination is not subject to the modification provisions applicable to alimony orders. Ellis v. Ellis, 135 Vt. 83, 370 A.2d 200, 1977 Vt. LEXIS 561 (1977).

§ 759.
Repealed.
1973, No. 201 (Adj. Sess.), § 12.

§§ 760-761.
Repealed.
1981, No. 247 (Adj. Sess.), § 18.

§ 762.
Insurance benefits.

In a proceeding under this chapter, the court may assign insurance benefits to a spouse or children, and may require the spouse who is required to make the assignment to execute a blanket assignment giving notice of the assignment to the provider of the insurance benefits.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 14.